Utah statutes.
59-10-407.   Withholding tax prepayments.
(1)  This section does not apply to an employer filing a withholding tax
return for a period under this part other than a quarterly period.
(2) (a)  Any employer whose withholding tax liability under Section 59-10-402
is estimated to average an amount designated by the commission by rule shall
make a monthly prepayment of the amount required to be paid by Section
59-10-406 for each monthly period of each quarterly period.
(b)  An employer that makes a monthly prepayment described in this Subsection
(2) shall make the monthly prepayment as provided in this section until the
commission notifies the employer in writing.
(c) (i)  An employer shall file a form with a monthly prepayment.
(ii)  The commission shall prescribe and furnish the form described in
Subsection (2)(c)(i).
(iii)  An employer shall make a monthly prepayment and file the form described
in Subsection (2)(c)(i) on or before the last day of the month after the end
of each monthly period of each quarterly period.
(3)  In determining whether an employer's estimated withholding tax liability
will average an amount that requires a monthly prepayment, the commission may
consider:
(a)  a return filed pursuant to Section 59-10-406; or
(b)  information in the commission's possession or that may come into the
commission's possession.
(4) The penalties and interest for failure to make a monthly prepayment and
file the form described in Subsection (2)(c)(i) by the due date described in
Subsection (2)(c)(iii) are the same as the penalties and interest under
Sections 59-1-401 and 59-1-402 relating to payment of a tax, fee, or charge or
filing a return.
